Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.705

Supplemental principles of law.

Unless displaced by particular provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and equity supplement this chapter.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1702.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.